Hawaii statutes.
§432E-5 Complaints and appeals procedure
for enrollees. (a) A health carrier with enrollees in this State shall
establish and maintain a procedure to provide for the resolution of an
enrollee's complaints and internal appeals. The procedure shall provide for
expedited internal appeals under section 432E-6.5. The definition of medical
necessity in section 432E-1.4 shall apply in a health carrier's complaints and
internal appeals procedures.

(b) The health carrier shall at all times make
available its complaints and internal appeals procedures. The complaints and
internal appeals procedures shall be reasonably understandable to the average
layperson and shall be provided in a language other than English upon request.

(c) A health carrier shall decide any
expedited internal appeal as soon as possible after receipt of the complaint,
taking into account the medical exigencies of the case, but not later than
seventy-two hours after receipt of the request for expedited appeal.

(d) A health carrier shall send notice of its
final internal determination within sixty days of the submission of the
complaint to the enrollee, the enrollee's appointed representative, if
applicable, the enrollee's treating provider, and the commissioner. The notice
shall include the following information regarding the enrollee's rights and
procedures:

(1) The enrollee's right to request an external
review;

(2) The one hundred thirty day deadline for
requesting an external review;

(3) Instructions on how to request an external review;
and

(4) Where to submit the request for an external
review.

In addition to these general requirements, the
notice shall conform to the requirements of sections 432E-35 and 432E-36. [L
1998, c 178, pt of §2; am L 1999, c 137, §5; am L 2000, c 250, §4; am L 2004, c
27, §1; am L 2011, c 230, §7; am L 2012, c 34, §11]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next